Oklahoma, session 2025, SB296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357.301, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 313, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2357.301), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2357.301. As used in Sections 2357.301 through 2357.304


of this title:


1. “Aerospace sector” means a private or public organization


located in this state and engaged in the manufacture of aerospace or


defense hardware or software, aerospace maintenance, aerospace


repair and overhaul, supply of parts to the aerospace industry,


provision of services and support relating to the aerospace

Req. No. 1249 Page 1


industry, research and development of aerospace technology and


systems and the education and training of aerospace personnel;


2. “Compensation” means payments in the form of contract labor


for which the payor is required to provide a Form 1099 to the person


paid, wages subject to withholding tax paid to a part-time employee


or full-time employee or salary or other remuneration. Compensation


shall not include employer-provided retirement, medical or health-


care benefits, reimbursement for travel, meals, lodging or any other


expense;


3. “Institution” means an institution within The Oklahoma State


System of Higher Education or any other public or private college or


university that is accredited by a national accrediting body;


4. “Instructor pilot” means any person who is licensed as a


Certified Flight Instructor by the Federal Aviation Administration


and is employed in this state in support of a contract with the


federal government to provide instruction either live or on a flight


simulator who was not employed as an instructor pilot in the


aerospace sector in this state immediately preceding employment or


contracting with a qualified employer. The definition shall not be


interpreted to exclude any person (1) who previously qualified and


established the credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section


2355 of this title and becomes employed by a different qualified


employer, or (2) who establishes the credit against the tax imposed


pursuant to Section 2355 of this title for the first time and

Req. No. 1249 Page 2


becomes employed by a different qualified employer in subsequent


years, provided a person in either case has not claimed the credit


for the lifetime maximum of five (5) years;


5. “Qualified employer” means a sole proprietor, general


partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company,


corporation, other legally recognized business entity or public


entity whose principal business activity involves the aerospace


sector;


5. 6. “Qualified employee” means any person, regardless of the


date of hire, employed in this state by or contracting in this state


with a qualified employer on or after January 1, 2009, who was not


employed in the aerospace sector in this state immediately preceding


employment or contracting with a qualified employer, and who has


been either:


a. awarded an undergraduate or graduate degree from a


qualified program by an institution, or


b. licensed as a Professional Engineer by the State Board


of Licensure for Professional Engineers and Land


Surveyors pursuant to Section 475.15 of Title 59 of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


Provided, the definition shall not be interpreted to exclude any


person who was employed in the aerospace sector, but not as a full-


time engineer, prior to being awarded an undergraduate or graduate


degree from a qualified program by an institution or any person who

Req. No. 1249 Page 3


has been awarded an undergraduate or graduate degree from a


qualified program by an institution and is employed by a


professional staffing company and assigned to work in the aerospace


sector in this state.


Beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the definition shall also


not be interpreted to exclude any person (1) who previously


qualified and established the credit against the tax imposed


pursuant to Section 2355 of this title and becomes employed by a


different qualified employer, or (2) who establishes the credit


against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of this title for


the first time and becomes employed by a different qualified


employer in subsequent years, provided a person in either case has


not claimed the credit for the lifetime maximum of five (5) years;


6. 7. “Qualified program” means a program at an institution


that includes a graduate or undergraduate program that has been


accredited by the Engineering Accreditation Commission of the


Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology (ABET) and that


awards an undergraduate or graduate degree. Both the undergraduate


and graduate programs of the same discipline of engineering at an


institution shall be part of the qualified program if either program


is ABET accredited; and


7. 8. “Tuition” means the average annual amount paid by a


qualified employee for enrollment and instruction in a qualified



Req. No. 1249 Page 4


program. Tuition shall not include the cost of books, fees or room


and board.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357.303, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2357.303. A. Except as provided in subsection F of


this section, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2008,


and ending before January 1, 2026, a qualified employer shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of


this title for compensation paid to a qualified employee and, for


tax year 2025, an instructor pilot.


B. The credit authorized by subsection A of this section shall


be in the amount of:


1. Ten percent (10%) of the compensation paid for the first


through fifth years of employment in the aerospace sector if the


qualified employee graduated from an institution located in this


state; or


2. Five percent (5%) of the compensation paid for the first


through fifth years of employment in the aerospace sector if the


qualified employee graduated from an institution located outside


this state.


C. The credit authorized by this section shall not exceed


Twelve Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($12,500.00) for each qualified


employee annually.



Req. No. 1249 Page 5


D. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to


reduce the tax liability of the qualified employer to less than zero


(0).


E. No credit authorized pursuant to this section shall be


claimed after the fifth year of employment.


F. No credit otherwise authorized by the provisions of this


section may be claimed for any event, transaction, investment,


expenditure or other act occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for


which the credit would otherwise be allowable. The provisions of


this subsection shall cease to be operative on July 1, 2011.


Beginning July 1, 2011, the credit authorized by this section may be


claimed for any event, transaction, investment, expenditure or other


act occurring on or after July 1, 2011, according to the provisions


of this section.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357.304, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 313, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2357.304), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2357.304. A. Except as provided in subsection D of


this section, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2008,


and ending before January 1, 2026, a qualified employee and, for tax


year 2025, an instructor pilot shall be allowed a credit against the


tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of this title of up to Five


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per tax year for a period of time not



Req. No. 1249 Page 6


to exceed five (5) years during the lifetime of the qualified


employee. This credit may be claimed in nonconsecutive tax years.


B. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to


reduce the tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero (0).


C. Any credit claimed, but not used, may be carried over, in


order, to each of the five (5) subsequent taxable years.


D. No credit otherwise authorized by the provisions of this


section may be claimed for any event, transaction, investment,


expenditure or other act occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for


which the credit would otherwise be allowable. The provisions of


this subsection shall cease to be operative on July 1, 2011.


Beginning July 1, 2011, the credit authorized by this section may be


claimed for any event, transaction, investment, expenditure or other


act occurring on or after July 1, 2011, according to the provisions


of this section.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1249 QD 12/30/2024 11:25:34 PM













Req. No. 1249 Page 7